Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB761.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 651, 671(a), 1121-A(a) and 1122-A(a)(1) and (2) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 651. Fiscal Year.--In all school districts of the first class and first class A, the fiscal year shall begin on the first day of January in each year: Provided, That the Board of Public Education of any district of the first class or first class A may, by resolution adopted by two-thirds vote of the members thereof at a meeting of the board after not less than ten days' notice of the fact that such resolution would be 12345678910111213141516171819202122 presented for action at such meeting, fix the fiscal year of such school district so as to begin on the first day of [July] August in each year instead of on the first day of January as hereinabove provided.Section 671. Fiscal Year.--(a) In all school districts of the second, third, and fourth class, the fiscal year shall begin on the first day of [July] August in each year: Provided, That the board of school directors of any district of the second class may, by resolution adopted by two-thirds vote of the members thereof at a meeting of the board after not less than ten days' notice of the fact that such resolution would be presented for action at such meeting, fix the fiscal year of such school district so as to begin on the first day of January in each year instead of on the first day of [July] August as hereinabove provided.* * *Section 1121-A. Submission to Mediation.--(a) If, after a reasonable period of negotiation, a dispute or impasse exists between the representatives of the employer and the employe organization, the parties may voluntarily submit to mediation, but, if no agreement is reached between the parties within forty-five (45) days after negotiations have commenced, but in no event later than one hundred twenty-six (126) days prior to [June 30] July 31 or December 31, whichever is the end of the school entity's fiscal year, and mediation has not been utilized by the parties, both parties shall immediately in writing call on the service of the Pennsylvania Bureau of Mediation.* * *Section 1122-A. Fact-finding Panels.--(a) (1) Once mediation has commenced, it shall continue for so long as the 20250SB0761PN0812 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parties have not reached an agreement. If, however, an agreement has not been reached within forty-five (45) days after mediation has commenced or in no event later than eighty-one (81) days prior to [June 30] July 31 or December 31, whichever is the end of the school entity's fiscal year, the Bureau of Mediation shall notify the board of the parties' failure to reach an agreement and of whether either party has requested the appointment of a fact-finding panel.(2) No later than eighty-one (81) days prior to [June 30] July 31 or December 31, whichever is the end of the school entity's fiscal year, either party may request the board to appoint a fact-finding panel. Upon receiving such request, the board shall appoint a fact-finding panel which may consist of either one (1) or three (3) members. The panel so designated or selected shall hold hearings and take oral or written testimony and shall have subpoena power. If, during this time, the parties have not reached an independent agreement, the panel shall make findings of fact and recommendations. The panel shall not find or recommend that the parties accept or adopt an impasse procedure.* * *Section 2. The amendment of sections 651, 671(a), 1121-A(a) and 1122-A(a)(1) and (2) of the act shall apply to the first fiscal year of a school district commencing after the effective date of this section and each fiscal year thereafter.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0761PN0812 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526